Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 4 Accounting of Contribution; Apportionment; Setoff

23-2-70.
Scope of equity jurisdiction over matters of account.

Equity jurisdiction over matters of account shall extend to:

Mutual accounts growing out of privity of contract;

Cases where accounts are complicated and intricate;

Cases where a discovery or writ of ne exeat is prayed and granted;

Cases where the account is of a trust fund;

Accounts between partners or tenants in common; and

Cases where a multiplicity of actions would render a trial difficult, expensive, and unsatisfactory at law.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3063; Code 1868, § 3075; Code 1873, § 3130; Code 1882, § 3130; Civil Code 1895, § 3989; Civil Code 1910, § 4586; Code 1933, § 37-301.

Law reviews.

For article, “Some Problems in Providing for Nonjudicial Settlement of the Trustee’s Accounts,” see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 417 (1967).

Partners or Tenants in Common

A court of equity has jurisdiction in all cases of an accounting and settlement between partners.

Smith v. Hancock,

163 Ga. 222

,

136 S.E. 52

, 1926 Ga. LEXIS 51 (1926).

An accounting without dissolution will be granted

where one partner refuses to allow another to participate in the business. Hogan v. Walsh,

122 Ga. 283

,

50 S.E. 84

, 1905 Ga. LEXIS 178 (1905); Zerounis v. Berry,

199 Ga. 410

,

34 S.E.2d 275

, 1945 Ga. LEXIS 309 (1945).

A prayer that one partner be compelled to pay another

one-half of the net profit of the business includes a prayer for accounting. Bennett v. Woolfolk,

15 Ga. 213

, 1854 Ga. LEXIS 26 (1854).

Depreciation of assets subsequent to the dissolution must be borne by the partnership.

Houston v. Polk,

124 Ga. 103

,

52 S.E. 83

, 1905 Ga. LEXIS 662 (1905).

Partners may have a receiver appointed to settle the partnership affairs.

Bennett v. Smith,

108 Ga. 466

,

34 S.E. 156

, 1899 Ga. LEXIS 275 (1899).

The waiver of discovery by a partner is immaterial.

Huger v. Cunningham,

126 Ga. 684

,

56 S.E. 64

, 1906 Ga. LEXIS 515 (1906).

When equitable action not maintainable. —

Where the plaintiff contends all partnership relations between the plaintiff and the defendant have come to an end, that a balance has been struck, and that an indebtedness is allegedly due by the defendant to the plaintiff, which cannot be affected by any transactions between the partnership and its creditors or debtors, this is not an equitable action by a member of a firm against his copartner, but an action of law, one man against another who had formerly been his partner, upon an indebtedness a part of which grew out of the formerly existing partnership between them. Manry v. Hendricks,

192 Ga. 319

,

15 S.E.2d 434

, 1941 Ga. LEXIS 464, transferred,

66 Ga. App. 442

,

18 S.E.2d 97

, 1941 Ga. App. LEXIS 531 (1941).

Action for accounting not tenable in equity. —

Where the partnership has been fully dissolved by written contract and the rights of each party definitely established, in case of a breach of such contract equity will not order an accounting, as the remedy is at law. Manry v. Hendricks,

192 Ga. 319

,

15 S.E.2d 434

, 1941 Ga. LEXIS 464, transferred,

66 Ga. App. 442

,

18 S.E.2d 97

, 1941 Ga. App. LEXIS 531 (1941).

When an accounting is involved a city court is without jurisdiction.

Dixon v. Hyde,

25 Ga. App. 84

,

102 S.E. 910

, 1920 Ga. App. LEXIS 610 (1920).

Cotenant may be compelled in equity to account to another for a just share of the profits.

Huff v. McDonald,

22 Ga. 131

, 1857 Ga. LEXIS 131 (1857).

Equity has concurrent jurisdiction with courts of law, over matters of account between tenants in common,

and when asserted, a court will hold and exercise equitable jurisdiction for the purpose of settling all the equities between the tenants, growing out of the tenancy in common. Bailey v. Bell,

209 Ga. 566

,

74 S.E.2d 881

, 1953 Ga. LEXIS 349 (1953).

A case in equity is presented by a petition which not only embraces a statutory application for partition,

but also prays for an accounting from cotenants for rents and profits. Werner v. Werner,

196 Ga. 1

,

25 S.E.2d 676

, 1943 Ga. LEXIS 296 (1943).

Exercise by the superior court of its equity jurisdiction to fully and adequately resolve all issues

between tenants in common would not be an interference with the orderly administration of estate. Evans v. Little,

246 Ga. 219

,

271 S.E.2d 138

, 1980 Ga. LEXIS 1057 (1980).

When action for partitioning and accounting proper. —

Where a number of cotenants are in possession of all of the common property, and are collecting the rents and profits thereof, an equitable action for partitioning and accounting by those not in possession of the property is a proper remedy. Bailey v. Bell,

209 Ga. 566

,

74 S.E.2d 881

, 1953 Ga. LEXIS 349 (1953).

Accounting between cotenants for a just share of the profits is applicable

where a partition of the land is granted. Turnbull v. Foster,

116 Ga. 765

,

43 S.E. 42

, 1902 Ga. LEXIS 252 (1902).

A court may entertain a partition proceeding without trying first, or in connection therewith, a suit for accounting

concerning the same property held in cotenancy. Lankford v. Milhollin,

200 Ga. 512

,

37 S.E.2d 197

, 1946 Ga. LEXIS 392 (1946).

It is within the power of the court to order a sale of the common property

prior to the trial of the main accounting suit. Whether such partition proceeding is heard before the trial of the suit for accounting is a matter resting within the sound discretion of the court. Lankford v. Milhollin,

200 Ga. 512

,

37 S.E.2d 197

, 1946 Ga. LEXIS 392 (1946).

While equity jurisdiction ceased when the General Assembly gave a specific remedy at law,

and while a specific legal remedy for partition was provided by statutory partition (O.C.G.A. §

44-6-160

) and under former Code 1933, § 85-1501 (see O.C.G.A. §

44-6-140

) equity will not ordinarily take cognizance of a partition proceeding unless the remedy at law was insufficient, or peculiar circumstances render the proceeding in equity more suitable and just, accounting between tenants in common will alone and of itself give a court of equity jurisdiction of a partition proceeding, whether or not there were other peculiar circumstances which render the proceeding in equity more suitable and just. Mills v. Williams,

208 Ga. 425

,

67 S.E.2d 212

, 1951 Ga. LEXIS 385 (1951).

Counterclaim for partition by sale proper. —

Where a tenant-in-common sues his cotenant for an accounting and for rents and profits, and a cross action (now counterclaim) is filed by the latter for partition by sale of the common property, such cross action (now counterclaim) is germane to the original action, and the court may direct partition by sale where it appears that the common property cannot be fairly and equitably divided by metes and bounds and it is proper for the decree to direct that the funds be held in court pending the trial of the action for accounting. Lankford v. Milhollin,

200 Ga. 512

,

37 S.E.2d 197

, 1946 Ga. LEXIS 392 (1946).

Distribution of sales proceeds upheld. —

In a dispute over real property and specific performance of a Redemption Agreement, the trial court did not abuse the court’s discretion in making an equitable award because O.C.G.A. §§

44-6-140

and

44-6-141

granted the court the authority to adjust the accounts and claims of the parties as required by the circumstances and, more specifically, authorized the trial court to consider all of the circumstances, including any circumstances that occurred after the making of the contract. Bagwell v. Trammel,

297 Ga. 873

,

778 S.E.2d 173

, 2015 Ga. LEXIS 671 (2015).

Accessory to misapplication of trust funds accountable to injured person. —

One who aids and assists a trustee in misapplying trust funds, with knowledge of his misconduct, is directly accountable to the person injured by such misapplication, even though the person thus assisting the trustee does not himself reap the fruits of the misappropriation. Atlanta Trust Co. v. National Bondholders Corp.,

188 Ga. 761

,

4 S.E.2d 644

, 1939 Ga. LEXIS 608 (1939).

Person injured by the misconduct may join in one suit

the person occupying the fiduciary relationship and one who aids and assists one in misapplying trust assets. Atlanta Trust Co. v. National Bondholders Corp.,

188 Ga. 761

,

4 S.E.2d 644

, 1939 Ga. LEXIS 608 (1939).

Some evidence admissible in accounting action. —

In an action for accounting and other relief between joint owners of property, tax receipts tending to show that one of the owners had paid the tax on the joint property for certain years were admissible. Head v. Lee,

203 Ga. 191

,

45 S.E.2d 666

, 1947 Ga. LEXIS 589 (1947).

Effect of consent decree on equitable action between cotenants. —

Where one tenant in common brings an equitable action against his cotenants for partition of land and for an accounting of rents, issues, and profits, and a consent decree is taken, fixing the rights and liabilities of the parties as between themselves, and decreeing their respective interests in the land, in the further progress of the case, where the decree is not attacked, the parties will not be permitted to go behind the decree so as to reopen the subject. All prior agreements and controversies between the parties, whether such were expressly pleaded or not, are merged in the decree. Johnson v. James,

246 Ga. 680

,

272 S.E.2d 692

, 1980 Ga. LEXIS 1248 (1980).

23-2-71.
Entitlement to contribution; when equity has jurisdiction.

In cases of joint, joint and several, or several liabilities of two or more persons, where all are equally bound to bear the common burden and one has paid more than his share, he shall be entitled to contribution from the others; and whenever the circumstances are such that an action at law will not give a complete remedy, equity may entertain jurisdiction.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3065; Code 1868, § 3077; Code 1873, § 3132; Code 1882, § 3132; Civil Code 1895, § 3991; Civil Code 1910, § 4588; Code 1933, § 37-303.

Cross references.

Right to contribution among joint trespassers, § 51-12-32.

Law reviews.

For note, “Contribution Among Joint Tortfeasors,” see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 553 (1978).

23-2-72.
Apportionment of contract, rent, or hire.

Apportionment of a contract or of rent or hire may, from peculiar circumstances rendering the common-law remedy incomplete, become the subject of equitable jurisdiction.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3067; Code 1868, § 3079; Code 1873, § 3134; Code 1882, § 3134; Civil Code 1895, § 3993; Civil Code 1910, § 4590; Code 1933, § 37-305.

23-2-73.
Discharge of encumbrances affecting several interests.

Where several persons are interested in an estate as tenants for years, or for life, or in remainder or reversion, and encumbrances are to be discharged, the equitable division of the burden, according to the several interests, shall be a question for equitable interference.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3066; Code 1868, § 3078; Code 1873, § 3133; Code 1882, § 3133; Civil Code 1895, § 3992; Civil Code 1910, § 4589; Code 1933, § 37-304.

23-2-74.
Burden of distinguishing mingled property.

If a party who has charge of the property of others shall so confound it with his own that the line of distinction cannot be drawn, all the inconvenience shall be thrown upon him who causes the confusion; and he shall distinguish his own property or lose it.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3064; Code 1868, § 3076; Code 1873, § 3131; Code 1882, § 3131; Civil Code 1895, § 3990; Civil Code 1910, § 4587; Code 1933, § 37-302.

23-2-75.
Offer to pay balance unnecessary.

A petition for an accounting need not offer to pay a balance if found against the complainant.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3069; Code 1868, § 3081; Code 1873, § 3136; Code 1882, § 3136; Civil Code 1895, § 3995; Civil Code 1910, § 4592; Code 1933, § 37-307.

23-2-76.
Equitable setoff.

Regarding a setoff, equity generally follows the law; but, if there is an intervening equity not reached by the law or if the setoff is of an equitable nature, equity shall take jurisdiction to enforce the setoff.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3072; Code 1868, § 3084; Code 1873, § 3141; Code 1882, § 3141; Civil Code 1895, § 3996; Civil Code 1910, § 4593; Code 1933, § 37-308.

Cross references.

Setoff and recoupment generally, T. 13, C. 7.

Law reviews.

For survey article citing developments in Georgia trial practice and procedure from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (1981).